Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.130

Boards of trustees—Bylaws, rules, and regulations—Chair and vice chair—Terms—Quorum.

Within thirty days of their appointment the various district boards of trustees shall organize, adopt bylaws for its own government, and make such rules and regulations not inconsistent with this chapter as they deem necessary. At such organizational meeting it shall elect from among its members a chair and vice chair, each to serve for one year, and annually thereafter shall elect such officers to serve until their successors are appointed or qualified. The chief executive officer of the college district, or designee, shall serve as secretary of the board. Three trustees shall constitute a quorum, and no action shall be taken by less than a majority of the trustees of the board. The district boards shall transmit such reports to the college board as may be requested by the college board. The fiscal year of the district boards shall conform to the fiscal year of the state.

[ 1991 c 238 s 38; 1977 c 75 s 27; 1973 c 62 s 18; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.50.130. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 8 s 13. Formerly RCW 28.85.130.]

NOTES:

Savings—Severability—1973 c 62: See notes following RCW 28B.10.510.

District president or president of college as secretary of board: RCW 28B.50.100.

Fiscal year defined: RCW 43.88.020.